de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Wiegen & Stubenwagen: Babyliegen & Babynester; Stubenwagen-Kinderbetten; Stubenwagen; Schlafzimmer-Stubenwagen; Umwandelbare Stubenwagen; Wiegen; Klappbare Stubenwagen; Hängende Stubenwagen; Schaukel-Stubenwagen; Reise-Stubenwagen
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Kurvevugger og vugger: Babyloungers og babynests; Kravlegårdskurvevugger; Kurvevugger; Sengekurvevugger; Konvertible kurvevugger; Vugger; Sammenklappelige kurvevugger; Hængende kurvevugger; Gyngende kurvevugger; Rejsekurvevugger
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > バシネット・ゆりかご: ベビーラウンジャー・ネスト; バシネットプレイヤード; バシネット; ベッドサイドバシネット; コンバーチブルバシネット; ゆりかご; 折りたたみ式バシネット; 吊り下げバシネット; ロッキングバシネット; トラベル用バシネット
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 摇篮车/摇篮: 婴儿躺椅和仿生床; 摇篮游戏架; 摇篮车; 床头摇篮车; 多功能摇篮车; 摇篮; 折叠摇篮; 悬挂式摇篮; 摇动摇篮; 旅行摇篮
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Babybedjes en wiegjes: Babyloungers en babynestjes; Babybedjes die fungeren als boxen; Babybedjes; Babybedjes voor aan bed; Converteerbare babybedjes; Wiegjes; Opvouwbare babybedjes; Hangende babybedjes; Schommelbabybedjes; Reisbabybedjes
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 嬰兒睡籃/搖籃: 嬰兒躺椅與睡窩; 遊戲床睡籃; 嬰兒睡籃; 床邊睡籃; 雙向睡籃; 搖籃; 折疊睡籃; 吊掛睡籃; 搖動睡籃; 旅行睡籃
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Lopšiai ir lovytės kūdikiams: Kūdikių gultukai ir lizdeliai; Lopšiai su žaidimų aikštele; Lopšiai; Prie lovos statomi lopšiai; Transformuojami lopšiai; Lovytės kūdikiams; Sulankstomi lopšiai; Kabantys lopšiai; Sūpuojami lopšiai; Kelioniniai lopšiai
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Detské košíky a kolísky: Detské ležadlá a hniezda; Kombinované postieľky s košíkom; Košíky; Košíky ku posteli; Konvertibilné košíky; Kolísky; Skladacie košíky; Závesné košíky; Hojdacie košíky; Cestovné košíky
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > ที่นอนเด็กอ่อนชนิดเข็นได้และที่นอนเด็กอ่อนชนิดโยกได้: เบาะรองนอนเด็กอ่อน; เปลเด็กแบบคอกกั้น; เปลเด็ก; เปลข้างเตียง; เปลเด็กแบบปรับได้; ที่นอนเด็กชนิดโยกได้; เปลเด็กแบบพับได้; เปลแขวน; เปลโยก; เปลเด็กสำหรับเดินทาง
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Berços e moisés: Ninhos e espreguiçadeiras para bebês; Playards de moisés; Moisés; Moisés de cabeceira; Moisés conversíveis; Berços; Moisés dobráveis; Moisés pendurados; Moisés de balanço; Moisés de viagem
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Pătuțuri și leagăne: Cuiburi și suporturi de relaxare pentru bebeluși; Locuri de joacă pentru pătuț; Pătuțuri; Pătuțuri pentru instalare lângă pat; Pătuțuri convertibile; Leagăne; Pătuțuri pliabile; Pătuțuri suspendate; Pătuțuri-balansoar; Pătuțuri de călătorie
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Koszyki i kołyski: Kokoniki i gniazdka niemowlęce; Koszyki z zestawem do zabawy; Łóżeczka; Łóżeczka dostawne; Łóżeczka składane; Kołyski; Koszyki składane; Koszyki wiszące; Koszyki bujane; Koszyki podróżne
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Колыбели и люльки: Коконы и гнездышки для новорожденных; Колыбели-манежи; Колыбели; Приставные колыбели; Колыбели-трансформеры; Люльки; Складные колыбели; Подвесные колыбели; Колыбели-качалки; Люльки для путешествий
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Berços e alcofas: Ninhos e espreguiçadeiras para bebés; Parques de berço; Berços; Berços de cabeceira; Berços conversíveis; Alcofas; Berços dobráveis; Berços de pendurar; Berços de embalar; Alcofas de viagem
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Košarice in zibelke: Otroški ležalniki in gnezda; Igralne košarice; Košarice; Košarice za ob posteljo; Prilagodljive košarice; Zibelke; Zložljive košarice; Viseče košarice; Gugalne košarice; Potovalne košarice
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Mélykosarak és bölcsők: Babafotelek és babafészkek; Mélykosár-játszóterek; Mélykosarak; Éjjeli mélykosarak; Átalakítható mélykosarak; Bölcsők; Összecsukható mélykosarak; Függő mélykosarak; Ringató mélykosarak; Utazó mélykosarak
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Vauvansängyt ja kehdot: Unipesät ja vauvojen lepotuolit; Vauvansängyt leikkiosiolla; Vauvansängyt; Sängynviereiset vauvansängyt; Muunnettavat vauvansängyt; Kehdot; Kokoontaittuvat vauvansängyt; Riippuvat vauvansängyt; Keinuvat vauvansängyt; Matkavauvansängyt
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Babykorgar och vaggor: Babynests & sittkuddar; Vaggor med lekhage; Vaggor; Sidovaggor; Konvertibla vaggor; Babykorgar; Fällbara vaggor; Hängande vaggor; Gungande vaggor; Resevaggor
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Λίκνα & κούνιες: Φωλιές μωρού; Λίκνα παιχνιδιού; Κούνιες (Bassinets); Λίκνα δίπλα στο κρεβάτι; Πτυσσόμενα λίκνα; Λίκνα; Αναδιπλούμενα λίκνα; Κρεμαστά λίκνα; Λίκνα με κίνηση; Ταξιδιωτικά λίκνα
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Nôi trẻ em: Nôi ngủ & đệm nằm cho bé; Nôi kết hợp cũi; Nôi; Nôi ngủ cạnh giường; Nôi trẻ em đa năng; Nôi em bé; Nôi gấp; Nôi treo; Nôi bập bênh; Nôi trẻ em du lịch
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > Bassinets & Cradles: Baby Loungers & Nests; Bassinet Playards; Bassinets; Bedside Bassinets; Convertible Bassinets; Cradles; Folding Bassinets; Hanging Bassinets; Rocking Bassinets; Travel Bassinets
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Dětské koše a kolébky: Dětská lehátka a hnízdečka; Dětské postýlky s ohrádkou; Dětské koše/postýlky; Přístavné postýlky k rodičovské posteli; Kombinované dětské koše/postýlky; Kolébky; Skládací dětské koše/postýlky; Závěsné dětské koše/postýlky; Dětské koše/postýlky s kolébkou; Cestovní dětské koše/postýlky
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Sepet Beşikler ve Beşikler: Babynest ve bebek oturma minderleri; Beşik Oyun Alanları; Sepet Beşikler; Başucu Beşikleri; Dönüştürülebilir Beşikler; Beşikler; Katlanır Beşikler; Asılı Beşikler; Sallanan Beşikler; Ana Kucakları
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Culle e culle per neonati: Poltroncine e riduttori per neonati; Box e culle per neonati; Culle per neonati; Culle per neonati accanto al letto; Culle per neonati convertibili; Culle; Culle per neonati pieghevoli; Culle per neonati sospese; Culle per neonati a dondolo; Culle per neonati da viaggio
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Kolijevke i njihaljke: Ležaljke i gnijezda za bebe; Vrtići; Kolijevke; Kolijevke uz krevet; Multifunkcionalne kolijevke; Njihaljke; Sklopive kolijevke; Viseće kolijevke; Njihajućie kolijevke; Putne kolijevke
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 요람/아기 침대: 아기 라운저 및 둥지 침대; 놀이용 요람; 요람; 베드사이드 요람; 컨버터블 요람; 아기 침대; 접이식 요람; 걸이식 요람; 흔들 요람; 여행용 요람
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Кошари и люлки: Бебешки шезлонги и гнезда; Кошари за игра; Бебешки кошари; Бебешки кошари за легло; Трансформируеми бебешки кошари; Люлки; Сгъваеми бебешки кошари; Висящи бебешки кошари; Люлеещи се бебешки кошари; Бебешки кошари за път
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Babysenger og vugger: Babynest og liggestoler; Babyseng-lekegrinder; Babysenger; Babysenger ved siden av sengen; Konvertible babysenger; Vugger; Sammenleggbare babysenger; Hengende babysenger; Vuggebabysenger; Reisebabysenger
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Cunas y moisés: Tumbonas y nidos para bebés; Parques de moisés; Moisés; Moisés de noche; Moisés convertibles; Cunas; Moisés plegables; Moisés colgantes; Moisés mecedores; Moisés de viaje
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Couffins et berceaux: Transats et nids pour bébés; Parcs pour berceaux; Couffins; Berceaux de chevet; Berceaux convertibles; Berceaux; Berceaux pliants; Berceaux suspendus; Berceaux à bascule; Berceaux de voyage